Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-2733
Permissible investments; types.

(1) The following investments are permissible investments for the purposes of section 8-2732:

(a) Cash, including demand deposits, savings deposits, and funds in such accounts held for the benefit of the licensee's customers in a federally insured depository financial institution;

(b) Cash equivalents, including automated clearinghouse items in transit to the licensee, automated clearinghouse items or international wires in transit to a payee, cash in transit via armored car, cash in smart safes, cash in licensee-owned locations, debit card-funded or credit card-funded transmission receivables owed by any financial institution, or money market mutual funds rated AAA by Standard and Poor's Corporation or the equivalent from any other eligible rating service;

(c) Certificates of deposit or senior debt obligations of an insured depository institution as defined in the Federal Deposit Insurance Act or an insured credit union as defined in the Federal Credit Union Act;

(d) An obligation of the United States or a commission, agency, or instrumentality thereof;

(e) An obligation that is guaranteed fully as to principal and interest by the United States;

(f) An obligation of a state or a governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality thereof; and

(g)(i) The full drawable amount of an irrevocable standby letter of credit, for which the stated beneficiary is the director, that stipulates that the beneficiary need only draw a sight draft under the letter of credit and present it to obtain funds up to the letter of credit amount within seven days after presentation of the items required by this subdivision.

(ii) The letter of credit shall:

(A) Be issued by a federally insured depository financial institution, a foreign bank that is authorized under federal law to maintain a federal agency or federal branch office in a state or states, or a foreign bank that is authorized under state law to maintain a branch in a state and such bank bears an eligible rating or whose parent company bears an eligible rating and is regulated, supervised, and examined by United States federal or state authorities having regulatory authority over banks, credit unions, and trust companies;

(B) Be irrevocable and unconditional and indicate that such letter of credit is not subject to any condition or qualifications outside of the letter of credit;

(C) Not contain reference to any other agreements, documents, or entities, or otherwise provide for any security interest in the licensee; and

(D) Contain an issue date and expiration date and expressly provide for automatic extension, without a written amendment, for an additional period of one year from the present or each future expiration date, unless the issuer of the letter of credit notifies the director in writing, by certified or registered mail or courier mail or other receipted means, at least sixty days prior to any expiration date that the irrevocable letter of credit will not be extended.

(iii) In the event of any notice of expiration or nonextension of a letter of credit, the licensee shall be required to demonstrate to the satisfaction of the director, fifteen days prior to expiration, that the licensee maintains and will maintain permissible investments in accordance with subsection (1) of section 8-2732 upon the expiration of the letter of credit. If the licensee is not able to do so, the director may draw on the letter of credit in an amount up to the amount necessary to meet the licensee's requirements to maintain permissible investments in accordance with subsection (1) of section 8-2732. Any such draw shall be offset against the licensee's outstanding money transmission obligations. The drawn funds shall be held in trust by the director or the director's designated agent, to the extent authorized by law, as agent for the benefit of the purchasers and holders of the licensee's outstanding money transmission obligations.

(iv) The letter of credit shall provide that the issuer of the letter of credit will honor, at sight, a presentation made by the beneficiary to the issuer of the following documents on or prior to the expiration date of the letter of credit:

(A) The original letter of credit, including any amendments; and

(B) A written statement from the beneficiary stating that any of the following events have occurred:

(I) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee under the United States Bankruptcy Code for bankruptcy or reorganization;

(II) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee for receivership or the commencement of any other judicial or administrative proceeding for dissolution or reorganization;

(III) The seizure of assets of a licensee by a director pursuant to an emergency order issued in accordance with applicable law, on the basis of an action, violation, or condition that has caused or is likely to cause the insolvency of the licensee; or

(IV) The beneficiary has received notice of expiration or nonextension of a letter of credit and the licensee failed to demonstrate to the satisfaction of the beneficiary that the licensee will maintain permissible investments in accordance with subsection (1) of section 8-2732 upon the expiration or nonextension of the letter of credit.

(v) The director may designate an agent to serve on the director's behalf as beneficiary to a letter of credit so long as the agent and letter of credit meet requirements established by the director. The director's agent may serve as agent for multiple licensing authorities for a single irrevocable letter of credit if the proceeds of the drawable amount for the purposes of this section are assigned to the director.

(vi) The director is authorized to participate in multistate processes designed to facilitate the issuance and administration of letters of credit, including, but not limited to, services provided by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry and State Regulatory Registry LLC.

(2) Unless permitted by the director, by rule or order, to exceed the limit as set forth in this section, the following investments are permissible investments for the purposes of section 8-2732 to the extent specified:

(a) Receivables that are payable to a licensee from authorized delegates in the ordinary course of business, received by the authorized delegates less than seven days old, and combined not exceeding fifty percent of the aggregate value of the licensee's total permissible investments, and receivables that are payable to a licensee from a single authorized delegate in the ordinary course of business, received by the authorized delegate less than seven days before, and combined not exceeding ten percent of the aggregate value of the licensee's total permissible investments;

(b) The following investment categories are permissible up to twenty percent of the aggregate value of the licensee's total permissible investments for each investment category and up to fifty percent of the aggregate value of the licensee's total permissible investments for all of the investment categories combined:

(i) A short-term, up to six months, investment bearing an eligible rating;

(ii) Commercial paper bearing an eligible rating;

(iii) A bill, note, bond, or debenture bearing an eligible rating;

(iv) A United States tri-party repurchase agreement collateralized at one hundred percent or more with United States Government or agency securities, municipal bonds, or other securities bearing an eligible rating;

(v) A money market mutual fund rated less than AAA and equal to or higher than A- by Standard and Poor's Corporation, or the equivalent from any other eligible rating service; and

(vi) A mutual fund or other investment fund composed solely and exclusively of one or more permissible investments described in subdivisions (1)(a) through (c) of this section; and

(c) Cash, including demand deposits, savings deposits, and funds in such accounts held for the benefit of the licensee's customers, at foreign depository institutions are permissible up to ten percent of the aggregate value of the licensee's total permissible investments if the licensee has received a satisfactory rating in the licensee's most recent examination and the foreign depository institution:

(i) Has an eligible rating;

(ii) Is registered under the Foreign Account Tax Compliance Act;

(iii) Is not located in any country subject to sanctions from the Office of Foreign Assets Control; and

(iv) Is not located in a high-risk or noncooperative jurisdiction as designated by the Financial Action Task Force.

Laws 2013, LB616, § 33;

Laws 2017, LB185, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 38.